Illinois, session 104th, HB1467.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 11-18.1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/11-18.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 11-18.1)7    Sec. 11-18.1. Patronizing a minor engaged in prostitution. 8    (a) Any person who engages in an act of sexual penetration 9as defined in Section 11-0.1 of this Code with a person engaged 10in prostitution who is under 18 years of age or is a person 11with a severe or profound intellectual disability commits 12patronizing a minor engaged in prostitution.13    (a-5) Any person who engages in any touching or fondling, 14with a person engaged in prostitution who either is under 18 15years of age or is a person with a severe or profound 16intellectual disability, of the sex organs of one person by 17the other person, with the intent to achieve sexual arousal or 18gratification, commits patronizing a minor engaged in 19prostitution. 20    (b) (Blank). It is an affirmative defense to the charge of 21patronizing a minor engaged in prostitution that the accused 22reasonably believed that the person was of the age of 18 years 23or over or was not a person with a severe or profound   HB1467- 2 -LRB104 07642 RLC 17686 b1intellectual disability at the time of the act giving rise to 2the charge.3    (c) Sentence. A person who commits patronizing a juvenile 4prostitute is guilty of a Class 3 felony, unless committed 5within 1,000 feet of real property comprising a school, in 6which case it is a Class 2 felony. A person convicted of a 7second or subsequent violation of this Section, or of any 8combination of such number of convictions under this Section 9and Sections 11-14 (prostitution), 11-14.1 (solicitation of a 10sexual act), 11-14.3 (promoting prostitution), 11-14.4 11(promoting juvenile prostitution), 11-15 (soliciting for a 12prostitute), 11-15.1 (soliciting for a juvenile prostitute), 1311-16 (pandering), 11-17 (keeping a place of prostitution), 1411-17.1 (keeping a place of juvenile prostitution), 11-18 15(patronizing a prostitute), 11-19 (pimping), 11-19.1 (juvenile 16pimping or aggravated juvenile pimping), or 11-19.2 17(exploitation of a child) of this Code, is guilty of a Class 2 18felony. The fact of such conviction is not an element of the 19offense and may not be disclosed to the jury during trial 20unless otherwise permitted by issues properly raised during 21such trial. 22(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.)